District of Columbia statutes.
2-1402.51

Posting of notice.

Every person subject to this chapter shall post and keep posted in a conspicuous location where business or activity is customarily conducted or negotiated, a notice whose language and form has been prepared by the Office, setting forth excerpts from or summaries of, the pertinent provisions of this chapter and information pertinent to the filing of a complaint.

Dec. 13, 1977, D.C. Law 2-38, title II, § 251, 24 DCR 6038
Bonds and construction procurement, construction contractors and subcontractors, agreement to post notice of nondiscrimination provisions, see § 2-305.08.
This section is referenced in § 2-1402.64.
1981 Ed., § 1-2522.
1973 Ed., § 6-2261.